Utah statutes.
78A-7-114.   Filing and docketing of abstract.

(1)  The judge, on the demand of a party in whose favor judgment is rendered, shall provide the party with an abstract of the judgment in substantially the form approved by the Judicial Council.

(2)  The abstract may be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of any county in the state but shall be docketed in the judgment docket of that district court.

(3)  The clerk shall note the time of receipt of the abstract on the abstract and on the docket.

